Hawaii statutes.
§634-29 In case of attachment, etc., of
real property. [Repeal and reenactment on June 30, 2020. L
2015, c 101, §4.] In all cases of attachment, sequestration, or injunction
of real property, the sheriff, deputy sheriff, police officer, or independent
civil process server from the department of public safety's list under section
353C-10 serving the writ shall, in addition to personal delivery of a copy
thereof to the defendant, post upon the premises a copy of the process, and a
notice of the day and hour when attached, sequestrated, or enjoined, and shall
also give notice thereof in a newspaper or newspapers suitable for the
advertisement of judicial proceedings. But in all cases where a writ of
attachment is issued in accordance with chapter 651 relating to attachments,
and the defendant in attachment was never a resident of the State or has
departed from the State or secretes oneself so that the writ of attachment
cannot be personally served upon the defendant, personal service of the writ
upon the defendant may be dispensed with. All after-leases, mortgages, sales,
devises, assignments, trusts, or other conveyances of the property, until the
dissolution of the process, shall be void in law as against the plaintiff in
such cases. [CC 1859, §1124; am L 1903, c 5, §1; am imp L 1917, c 67, §1; RL
1925, §2348; RL 1935, §4084; RL 1945, §10066; RL 1955, §230-37; HRS §634-64;
ren HRS §634-29; gen ch 1985; am L 2013, c 116, §§11, 25(10)]

Rules of Court

See HRCP rules 4(e), (f), 64, 65; DCRCP rule 64.

Proof of publication, see RCC rule 11.

Case Notes

Execution must be postponed to the lien of a prior
attachment. 6 H. 564 (1885).

Compliance with statute while essential to completion of a
title under the lien established by the levy of attachment constitutes no part
of the levy itself. 26 H. 342 (1922).

Section is in pari materia with §§651-44 and 651-49 and a
mortgage made subsequent to attachment is void as against attaching creditor.
51 H. 164, 454 P.2d 116 (1969).

Valid attachment is dissolved only if defendant puts up bond
or recovers judgment, or action is discontinued or dismissed. 51 H. 164, 454
P.2d 116 (1969).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next